Massachusetts, session 194th, H1690.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 22 of chapter 276 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 4, after the word “subscribed” the
following words:- , electronically or in person.
SECTION 2. Said section 22 of said chapter 276 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by inserting, in line 7, after the word “Procedure.” the following words:-
A law enforcement officer acting as complainant, may, if submitting a complaint electronically,
in lieu of being examined on oath by a justice, subscribe to the complaint electronically under the
pains and penalties of perjury.
of 2

SECTION 3. Section 2 of chapter 275 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting, in line 5, after the word “subscribed” the following words:- ,
electronically or in person,.
SECTION 4. Said section 2 of said chapter 275 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by inserting, in line 5, after the word “complainant.” the following
words:- A law enforcement officer acting as complainant, may, if submitting a complaint
electronically, in lieu of being examined on oath by such court or a justice, subscribe to the
complaint electronically under the pains and penalties of perjury.
of 2